Colorado, session 2026A, HB1201.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 38-33.3-209.5,
amend (1.7)(a) introductory portion, (1.7)(b)(II)(A), (1.7)(b)(III)(A),
(1.7)(b)(VI) introductory portion, and (6)(a); and add (1.7)(a.5) as
follows:
38-33.3-209.5. Responsible governance policies - due process
for imposition of fines - procedure for collection of delinquent
accounts - enforcement through small claims court - definitions.
(1.7) (a) EXCEPT AS DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (1.7)(a.5) OF THIS
SECTION, with regard to a unit owner's delinquency in paying assessments,
fines, or fees, an association shall:
(a.5) BEFORE AN ASSOCIATION COMPLIES WITH A UNIT OWNER'S
NOTICE INDICATING THAT THE UNIT OWNER PREFERS THAT
CORRESPONDENCE AND NOTICES FROM THE ASSOCIATION BE MADE IN A
LANGUAGE OTHER THAN ENGLISH PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (1.7)(a)(I)
OF THIS SECTION, THE ASSOCIATION MAY REQUIRE THE UNIT OWNER TO
DEMONSTRATE THE UNIT OWNER'S NEED FOR CORRESPONDENCE AND
NOTICES TO BE PROVIDED IN THE PREFERRED LANGUAGE. THE UNIT OWNER
MAY DEMONSTRATE SUCH NEED BY:
(I) SUBMITTING THE NOTICE DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (1.7)(a)(I)
-2- HB26-1201

OF THIS SECTION IN THE PREFERRED LANGUAGE;
(II) PROVIDING TO THE ASSOCIATION DOCUMENTATION
DEMONSTRATING THE UNIT OWNER'S PROFICIENCY IN THE PREFERRED
LANGUAGE. SUCH DOCUMENTATION MAY INCLUDE GOVERNMENT-ISSUED
DOCUMENTS LISTING THE PREFERRED LANGUAGE AS THE UNIT OWNER'S
PRIMARY LANGUAGE; SCHOOL, IMMIGRATION, OR COMMUNITY PROGRAM
DOCUMENTS INDICATING LITERACY IN THE PREFERRED LANGUAGE; OR A
LETTER OR OTHER DOCUMENT FROM AN INTERPRETER OR COMMUNITY
ORGANIZATION CERTIFYING THE UNIT OWNER'S PROFICIENCY IN THE
PREFERRED LANGUAGE.
(III) HAVING AN INTERPRETER PROVIDE A BRIEF STATEMENT TO
THE ASSOCIATION INDICATING THE UNIT OWNER'S PROFICIENCY IN THE
PREFERRED LANGUAGE; OR
(IV) PROVIDING TO THE ASSOCIATION DOCUMENTS
DEMONSTRATING A HISTORY OF COMMUNICATIONS TO AND FROM THE UNIT
OWNER IN THE PREFERRED LANGUAGE.
(b) (II) (A) With respect to any violation of the declaration,
bylaws, covenants, or other governing documents of an association that
the association reasonably determines threatens the public safety or
health, the association shall provide the unit owner written notice, in
English and in any language that FOR WHICH the unit owner has indicated
a preference for correspondence and notices pursuant to subsection
(1.7)(a)(I) of this section OR, IF NO PREFERENCE IS SO INDICATED
PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (1.7)(a)(I) OF THIS SECTION, IN ENGLISH, of the
violation informing the unit owner that the unit owner has seventy-two
hours to cure the violation or the association may fine the unit owner.
(III) (A) If an association reasonably determines that a unit owner
-3- HB26-1201

committed a violation of the declaration, bylaws, covenants, or other
governing documents of the association, other than a violation that
threatens the public safety or health, the association shall, through
certified mail, return receipt requested, provide the unit owner written
notice, in English and in any language that FOR WHICH the unit owner has
indicated a preference for correspondence and notices pursuant to
subsection (1.7)(a)(I) of this section OR, IF NO PREFERENCE IS INDICATED
PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (1.7)(a)(I) OF THIS SECTION, IN ENGLISH, of the
violation informing the unit owner that the unit owner has thirty days to
cure the violation or the association, after conducting an inspection and
determining that the unit owner has not cured the violation, may fine the
unit owner. However, the total amount of fines imposed for the violation
may not exceed five hundred dollars.
(VI) Once the AFTER A unit owner cures a violation, the
association shall notify the unit owner in English and in any language that
FOR WHICH the unit owner has indicated a preference for correspondence
and notices pursuant to subsection (1.7)(a)(I) of this section OR, IF NO
PREFERENCE IS INDICATED PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (1.7)(a)(I) OF THIS
SECTION, IN ENGLISH:
(6) A notice of delinquency that an association sends to a unit
owner for unpaid assessments, fines, fees, or charges must:
(a) Be written in English and in any language that FOR WHICH the
unit owner has indicated a preference for correspondence and notices
pursuant to subsection (1.7)(a)(I) of this section OR, IF NO PREFERENCE IS
INDICATED PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (1.7)(a)(I) OF THIS SECTION, IN
ENGLISH;
SECTION 2. Act subject to petition - effective date. This act
-4- HB26-1201

takes effect at 12:01 a.m. on the day following the expiration of the
ninety-day period after final adjournment of the general assembly (August
12, 2026, if adjournment sine die is on May 13, 2026); except that, if a
referendum petition is filed pursuant to section 1 (3) of article V of the
state constitution against this act or an item, section, or part of this act
within such period, then the act, item, section, or part will not take effect
unless approved by the people at the general election to be held in
November 2026 and, in such case, will take effect on the date of the
official declaration of the vote thereon by the governor.
-5- HB26-1201